Utah statutes.
53A-3-602.5.   School performance report -- Components -- Annual filing.
(1) For a school year beginning with or after the 2012-13 school year, the
State Board of Education in collaboration with the state's school districts
and charter schools shall develop a school performance report to inform the
state's residents of the quality of schools and the educational achievement of
students in the state's public education system.
(2)  The report described in Subsection (1) shall be written and include the
following statistical data for each school in a school district and each
charter school, as applicable, except as provided by Subsection (2)(g), and
shall also aggregate the data at the school district and state level:
(a) test scores over the previous year on:
(i)  criterion-referenced or online computer adaptive tests to include the
scores aggregated for all students:
(A)  by grade level or course for the previous two years and an indication of
whether there was a sufficient magnitude of gain in the scores between the two
years; and
(B)  by class;
(ii)  online writing assessments required under Section 53A-1-603; and
(iii)  tenth grade basic skills competency tests required under Section
53A-1-603;
(b)  college entrance examinations data, including the number and percentage
of each graduating class taking the examinations for the previous four years;
(c)  advanced placement and concurrent enrollment data, including:
(i)  the number of students taking advanced placement and concurrent
enrollment courses;
(ii)  the number and percent of students taking a specific advanced placement
course who take advanced placement tests to receive college credit for the
course;
(iii)  of those students taking the test referred to in Subsection (2)(c)(ii),
the number and percent who pass the test; and
(iv)  of those students taking a concurrent enrollment course, the number and
percent of those who receive college credit for the course;
(d)  the number and percent of students in grade 3 reading at or above grade
level;
(e)  the number and percent of students who were absent from school 10 days or
more during the school year;
(f)  achievement gaps that reflect the differences in achievement of various
student groups as defined by State Board of Education rule;
(g)  the number and percent of "student dropouts" within the school district
as defined by State Board of Education rule;
(h)  course-taking patterns and trends in secondary schools;
(i)  student mobility;
(j)  staff qualifications, to include years of professional service and the
number and percent of staff who have a degree or endorsement in their assigned
teaching area and the number and percent of staff who have a graduate degree;
(k)  the number and percent of parents who participate in SEP, SEOP, and
parent-teacher conferences;
(l)  average class size calculated in accordance with State Board of Education
rule adopted under Subsection (4);
(m)  average daily attendance as defined by State Board of Education rule,
including every period in secondary schools; and
(n)  enrollment totals disaggregated with respect to race, ethnicity, gender,
limited English proficiency, and those students who qualify for free or
reduced price school lunch.
(3) For a school year beginning with or after the 2012-13 school year, the
State Board of Education, in collaboration with the state's school districts
and charter schools, shall provide for the collection and electronic reporting
of the following data for a school in each school district and each charter
school:
(a)  test scores and trends over the previous four years on the tests referred
to in Subsection (2)(a);
(b)  the average grade given in each math, science, and English course in
grades 9 through 12 for which criterion-referenced or online computer adaptive
tests are required under Section 53A-1-603;
(c)  incidents of student discipline as defined by State Board of Education
rule, including suspensions, expulsions, and court referrals; and
(d)  the number and percent of students receiving fee waivers and the total
dollar amount of fees waived.
(4) (a)  The State Board of Education shall adopt common definitions and data
collection procedures for local school boards and charter schools to use in
collecting and forwarding the data required under Subsections (2) and (3) to
the state superintendent of public instruction.
(b) (i)  In accordance with Subsections (4)(b)(ii) through (4)(b)(iv), the
State Board of Education shall adopt rules specifying how average class size
shall be calculated.
(ii) (A)  Except as provided by Subsections (4)(b)(ii)(B) through
(4)(b)(ii)(D) or for nontraditional classes identified by rule, average class
size at the elementary school level shall:
(I)  be calculated by grade level; and
(II)  indicate the average number of students who are assigned to a teacher
for instruction together during a designated time period.
(B)  If students at the elementary school level receive instruction in core
classes from different teachers, average class size may be calculated as
provided by Subsection (4)(b)(iii) for secondary school students.
(C)  An elementary school class that includes students from multiple grade
levels shall be counted as a single class.
(D)  An extended day class in which a portion of the class arrives early and
the other portion stays late shall be counted as a single class.
(iii) (A)  Except as provided by Subsection (4)(b)(iii)(B) or for
nontraditional classes identified by rule, average class size at the secondary
school level shall:
(I)  be calculated for core language arts, mathematics, and science courses;
and
(II)  indicate the average number of students who are assigned to a teacher
for instruction together during a designated time period.
(B)  A secondary school class in which a teacher provides instruction in
multiple courses shall be counted as a single class.
(iv)  Special education classes and online classes shall be excluded when
determining average class size by grade at the elementary school level or the
average class size of core language arts, mathematics, and science courses at
the secondary level.
(c)  The State Board of Education, through the state superintendent of public
instruction, shall adopt standard reporting forms and provide a common
template for collecting and reporting the data, which shall be used by all
school districts and charter schools.
(d)  The state superintendent shall use the automated decision support system
referred to in Section 53A-1-301 to collect and report the data required under
Subsections (2) and (3).
(5) For a school year beginning with or after the 2012-13 school year, the
State Board of Education, through the state superintendent of public
instruction, shall issue its report annually by October 1 to include the
required data from the previous school year or years as indicated in
Subsections (2) and (3).
(6) (a)  Each local school board and each charter school shall receive a
written or an electronic copy of the report from the state superintendent of
public instruction containing the data for that school district or charter
school in a clear summary format and have it distributed, on a one per
household basis, to the residence of students enrolled in the school district
or charter school before November 30th of each year.
(b)  Each local school board, each charter school, and the State Board of
Education shall have a complete report of the statewide data available for
copying or in an electronic format at their respective offices.
